Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-435
Licensee; reporting and investigation duties.

Every licensee subject to the Uniform Controlled Substances Act shall be subject to and comply with sections 38-1,124 to 38-1,126 relating to reporting and investigations.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1123.